Utah statutes.
23-20-8.   Waste of wildlife unlawful.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, or by rule made by the Wildlife Board under this title, or by an order or proclamation issued in accordance with a rule made by the Wildlife Board under this title, a person may not waste or permit to be wasted protected wildlife or a part of protected wildlife.



Amended by Chapter 282, 2013 General Session

